Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 11 O.S. 2021, Section 42-106.1, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 33, O.S.L. 2024 (11 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 42-106.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 42-106.1. A. Any restrictive covenant on property
contained in a residential addition may be amended if:
1. The restrictive covenant has been in existence for at least
ten (10) years and the amendment is approved by the owners of at
least seventy percent (70%) of the parcels contained in the addition
or the amount specified in the restrictive covenant, whichever is
less; or
2. The restrictive covenant has been in existence for at least
fifteen (15) years and the amendment is approved by the owners of at
least sixty percent (60%) of the parcels contained in the addition

or the amount specified in the restrictive covenant, whichever is
less.
B. Where a preliminary plat has been filed for a residential
addition, the requirements of paragraphs 1 and 2 of subsection A of
this section shall include all the parcels contained in the
preliminary plat.
C. In the absence of a provision providing for the amendment of
the restrictive covenants of a residential addition the requirements
of paragraphs 1 and 2 of subsection A of this section shall apply.
A thirty-day notice of any meeting called to amend the restrictive
covenants shall be provided to the owners of every parcel contained
in the addition. Each parcel shall be entitled to one vote.
D. The recorded restrictive covenants on property contained in
a residential addition may be amended by the addition of a new
covenant creating a neighborhood association for the addition that
would require the mandatory participation of the successors-in-
interest of all record owners of parcels within the addition at the
time the amendment is recorded. The amendment must shall be
approved by the record owners of at least sixty percent (60%) of the
parcels contained in the addition and shall be subject to the
following:
1. The amendment shall provide that participation in the
neighborhood association created by the amendment shall not be
mandatory for persons who are record owners of parcels within the
residential addition at the time the amendment is filed of record,
but such participation shall be mandatory for all successors-in-
interest of the record owners;
2. The amendment must shall provide that the concurring vote of
not less than sixty percent (60%) of the record owners of parcels
contained in the addition shall be necessary for the establishment
or change of dues for the neighborhood association; and
3. Following approval, the amendment shall be filed of record
in the office of the county clerk of the county wherein the
residential addition is located against all parcels within the
addition. The term amendment may apply to an existing covenant or
to a new subject not addressed in existing covenants.
ENR. S. B. NO. 2139 Page 2

A thirty-day written notice of any meeting called to approve any
such amendment shall be provided to the owners of every parcel
contained in the residential addition. The notice of such meeting
shall be published in a newspaper in the county at least fourteen
(14) days before the meeting. The notice shall also be given by
publication in the neighborhood newsletter. Each parcel within the
addition shall be entitled to one vote. Any amendment approved and
recorded pursuant to this subsection may thereafter be revoked by
approval of sixty percent (60%) of the record owners of parcels
within the addition.
E. A municipality may amend an existing plat which was
previously filed with the office of the county clerk of the county
where the addition is located to remove an illegal discriminatory
restrictive covenant pursuant to the Fair Housing Act, 42 U.S.C.,
Section 3601 et seq. The amendment shall be filed on record in the
office of the county clerk of the county where the addition is
located against all parcels within the addition after:
1. The municipality provides thirty (30) days’ written notice
to all property owners of all parcels within the addition of the
proposed amendment to remove an illegal discriminatory restrictive
covenant, the notice including the time, date, and place of the
planning commission meeting where the amendment will be considered;
and
2. The governing body of the municipality approves the amended
plat.
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as requiring the
approval of the amended plat by the property owners of all parcels
within the addition.
F. 1. Upon the adoption and recording of an ordinance amending
a recorded plat to redact, remove, or strike the discriminatory
language from the existing plat, the municipality shall provide the
county clerk an Affidavit Regarding Correction of Plats, containing
the following:
a. the title of the plat to be corrected,
ENR. S. B. NO. 2139 Page 3

b. a reference to the book and page number in which the
existing plat has been recorded with the county
clerk’s office,
c. the section, township, and range of the plat,
d. recitation of the discriminatory language to be
redacted, removed, or stricken from the plat, and
e. a copy of the existing plat identifying the
discriminatory language to be redacted, removed, or
stricken; and
2. Upon receipt of an Affidavit Regarding Correction of Plats
from a municipality submitted in accordance with this section, the
county clerk shall make redactions to the electronic version of the
plat on the county clerk’s website in accordance with the
information provided in the affidavit.
F. G. An illegal discriminatory restrictive covenant contained
on a plat is not enforceable in this state, and all illegal
discriminatory restrictive covenants contained in plats recorded in
this state are unlawful, unenforceable, and declared null and void.
Any illegal discriminatory restrictive covenant contained in an
existing plat is extinguished and severed from the plat, with the
remainder of such plat remaining enforceable and effective.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 2139 Page 4

Passed the Senate the 26th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 2139 Page 5